Nevada, session 83, AB342.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 236 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The month of March of each year is designated as
“Women Veterans History Month” in this State.
2. The Governor shall issue annually a proclamation
encouraging the observance of Women Veterans History Month.
The proclamation must, without limitation, call upon the news
media, educators and appropriate governmental officers to bring
to the attention of the residents of Nevada the history of women
veterans and the contributions of women veterans to the State of
Nevada and the United States.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)